Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-249
Admission of additional limited partners.

(a) In connection with the formation of a limited partnership, a person acquiring a partnership interest as a limited partner is admitted as a limited partner of the limited partnership on the later to occur of:

(1) The date the original certificate of limited partnership is filed; or

(2) The time provided in the partnership agreement or, if no such time is provided in the agreement, when the person's admission is reflected in the records of the limited partnership.

(b) After the formation of a limited partnership, a person may be admitted as an additional limited partner:

(1) In the case of a person acquiring a partnership interest directly from the limited partnership, upon compliance with the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not so provide, upon the written consent of all partners and when the person's admission is reflected in the records of the limited partnership; and

(2) In the case of an assignee of a partnership interest, as provided in section 67-274.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 17;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 24.